New York, session 2025-2026, A3326.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 470 of the tax law, as amended by 2 chapter 728 of the laws of 2019, is amended and two new subdivisions 22 3 and 23 are added to read as follows: 4 2. "Tobacco products." Any cigar, including a little cigar, or tobac- 5 co, other than cigarettes, intended for consumption by smoking, chewing, 6 vaporizing or as snuff, and shall include e-cigarette cartridges and 7 electronic cigarette cartridges. "Tobacco products" shall not include 8 research tobacco products. 9 22. "Electronic cigarette" or "e-cigarette." A battery-operated device 10 that contains cartridges filled with a combination of nicotine, flavor 11 and/or chemicals that are turned into vapor which is inhaled by the 12 user. 13 23. "Electronic cigarette cartridge" or "e-cigarette cartridge." A 14 replaceable cartridge that contains nicotine or other chemicals and is 15 intended for use within an electronic cigarette or e-cigarette. 16 § 2. Section 1399-aa of the public health law is amended by adding a 17 new subdivision 19 to read as follows: 18 19. "Electronic cigarette cartridge" or "e-cigarette cartridge" means 19 a replaceable cartridge that contains nicotine or other chemicals and is 20 intended for use within an electronic cigarette or e-cigarette. 21 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 22 it shall have become a law; provided, however, that the department of 23 taxation and finance is authorized and directed to promulgate rules and 24 regulations necessary for the implementation of this act on or before 25 such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07133-01-5